Hawaii, session 2025, GM1211.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII:
SECTION 1. The legislature finds that the statewide
parking program for persons with disabilities, was established
to provide individuals with mobility disabilities the ability to
travel and park in accessible parking spaces via the use of
parking placards. However, improper use and insufficient
enforcement impact access for legitimate program participants.
The legislature further finds that adoption of electric
vehicles is a vital step in the State's efforts to combat
climate change, reach the 2045 mandated carbon neutrality, and
create a more sustainable future. The legislature has made
efforts to encourage and facilitate the adoption of electric
vehicles with tax credits and with designated charging parking
spaces. These parking spaces not only encourage the adoption of
electric vehicles but are a vital component to personal and
statewide use. The ability to park in an electric vehicle space
allows individuals to make sure they can continue to use their
2025-2856 SB1008 GDI SMA.docx
lll■llllllll■il■lllllilllll

Page 2
S.B. NO.
vehicle with ease and have the security to make it to their next
destination with adequate fuel.
The legislature concludes that the use of these spaces by
non-electric vehicles not only takes away an incentive granted
to electric vehicle drivers but can imperil their transportation
use by not allowing them the opportunity to recharge.
Therefore, the purpose of this Act is to authorize the
counties to adopt ordinances to enforce the accessible parking
space design requirements for parking for disabled persons and
parking for electric vehicles and any respective administrative
rules to ensure unimpeded access for program participants.
SECTION 2. Chapter 291, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is
amended by adding a new section to part III to be appropriately
designated and to read as follows:
"§291- Requirement to provide parking for persons with
disabilities; ordinances to enforce. (a) Each county may adopt
ordinances to:
(1) Enforce the design and construction requirements of
this part, and any administrative rules adopted
pursuant to this part, pertaining to the provision of
parking spaces and access to parking spaces reserved
2025-2856 SB1008 CDl SMA.docx
illHIMIIHIIHIIIIIilllll

Page 3
S.B. NO.
for persons with disabilities, including but not
limited to the number, location, design, and signage
of these parking spaces; and
(2) Establish penalties for failure to comply with
ordinances adopted pursuant to this section.
(b) An official appointed by a county may enter the
property of a place of public accommodation to enforce any
applicable ordinances adopted pursuant to this section.
(c) For the purposes of this section, "place of public
accommodation" has the same meaning as in section 489-2."
SECTION 3. Section 291-73, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is
amended to read as follows:
"[-£•] §291-73 (•}•] Ordinances to enforce authorized. (a)
Each county may adopt ordinances to enforce the requirements of
section 291-71, including the establishment of penalties for
failure to comply with the requirements of that section or
maintain electric vehicle charging systems in working order.
(b) Any official appointed by a county may enter the
property of a place of public accommodation to enforce any
applicable ordinances adopted pursuant to this section.
2025-2856 SB1008 CDl SMA.docx 3
iiiiiniiiiiiiiiiiiniiiiiiii

Page 4 S.B. NO. ““
h
(c) For the purposes of this section, "place of public
a£commodat wn/^has thc£arne jneanjj}2 a^Jji sectJ^on£8 92i^"
SECTION 4. Statutory material to be repealed is bracketed
and stricken. New statutory material is underscored.
SECTION 5. This Act shall take effect upon its approval.
2025-2856 SB1008 CDl SMA.docx 4
IIIIIMIIIIIIHHIIIIIIIIII

S.B. NO. 1008
H.D. 1
C.D. 1
APPROVED this 29th day of May , 2025

S.B.No. 1008, H.D. 1,C.D. 1
THE SENATE OF THE STATE OF HAW API
Date: April 30, 2025
Honolulu, Hawai‘i 96813
We hereby certify that the foregoing Bill this day passed Final Reading in the Senate
of the Thirty-Third Legislature of the State of Hawai‘i, Regular Session of 2025.
Clerk of the Senate
102

SB No. 1008, HD 1,CD 1
THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES OF THE STATE OF HAWAII
Date: April 30, 2025
Honolulu, Hawaii
We hereby eertify that the above-referenced Bill on this day passed Final Reading in the
House of Representatives of the Thirty-Third Legislature of the State of Hawaii, Regular Session
of2025.
Nadine K. Nakamura
Speaker
House of Representatives
Brian L. Takeshita
Chief Clerk
House of Representatives